Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1114.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 914. Possession of firearm at polling place.(a) Offense defined.--Except as provided under subsections (c) and (d)(2), a person commits an offense if the person:(1) knowingly possesses a firearm in any building, real property or parking area of a polling place holding an election;(2) knowingly possesses a firearm in any building, real property or parking area of a polling place holding an election with the intent of using the firearm in the commission of a crime; or1234567891011121314151617 (3) knowingly causes a firearm to be used in the commission of a crime in any building, real property or parking area of a polling place holding an election.(b) Grading.--(1) An offense committed under subsection (a)(1) shall constitute a misdemeanor of the third degree.(2) An offense committed under subsection (a)(2) or (3) shall constitute a misdemeanor of the first degree.(c) Exceptions.--Subsection (a) shall not apply to the following:(1) The lawful performance of official duties by an officer, agent or employee of the Federal Government, the Commonwealth or a political subdivision of the Commonwealth who is authorized to engage in or supervise the prevention, detection, investigation or prosecution of any violation of law.(2) The lawful performance of official duties by a law enforcement officer.(3) The concealment of a firearm inside a vehicle by a person who:(i) possesses a valid and lawfully issued license to carry a firearm; and(ii) owns the firearm.(4) The concealment of a firearm by a member of the Army, Navy, Marine Corps, Air Force or Coast Guard of the United States or the National Guard or organized reserves when on duty.(d) Posting of notice.--(1) Notice of the provisions of subsections (a), (b) and (c) shall be posted conspicuously at each public entrance of 20250HB1114PN1236 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a building where a polling place is located during an election.(2) A person shall not be convicted of an offense under subsection (a)(1) or (2) if the polling place fails to meet the notice requirements under paragraph (1).(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Election." A general, municipal, special or primary election as authorized under the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code."Firearm." Any weapon, including a starter gun, which will or is designed to expel a projectile or projectiles by the action of an explosion, expansion of gas or escape of gas. The term does not include any device designed or used exclusively for the firing of stud cartridges, explosive rivets or similar industrial ammunition."Law enforcement officer." As the term "peace officer" is defined in section 501 (relating to definitions)."Polling place." The room provided in each election district for voting during an election.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1114PN1236 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122